California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.4.

(a) The elections officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

(b) The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(1) The complete text of the proposition.

(2) The impartial analysis of the proposition, prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(3) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(4) The argument against the proposed district formation.

(c) The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 348.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6038.

On the day of any election held pursuant to this part, the polls at each of the polling places designated, shall be opened and closed as provided in Section 14212 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6039.

When the polls are closed, the board of election in every precinct at the election to be held for the formation of the district, shall close the polls in accordance with the general laws governing the election, and deposit the ballots with the county elections official in the county in which the election is held. At all subsequent elections, the returns shall be deposited with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6040.

The board of supervisors at its first regular meeting after the date of the election for the formation of the district shall canvass all of the returns of the election and shall have a finding entered in the minutes of the meeting showing the number of votes cast in each precinct for and against the district and the total number of votes cast and the names of the harbor commissioners for whom the votes were cast.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.

If from the canvass it appears and the board of supervisors finds that a majority of the votes were cast in favor of the formation of the district, it shall enter that fact upon its minutes, together with a description of the boundaries of the district, its name, the official name or names by which the district is commonly known and enter its order declaring the district duly formed and existing in the county in which the proceedings were had. The board of supervisors shall also make an order declaring the five candidates for harbor commissioner receiving the highest number of votes to have been elected to such office and cause a certificate of election to be issued to the successful candidates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

6042.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall thereupon make up and certify a copy of the minutes and order and transmit them to the Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6043.

The Secretary of State shall file the certificate in his office and within five days thereafter execute under the great seal of the State and transmit to the clerk of the county in which the proceedings were had, his certificate that a harbor district under the name set forth in the petition has been formed and exists in that county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6044.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall file the certificate in his or her office and from the filing of the certificate of the Secretary of State in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors, the formation of the district is complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.

An action or proceeding shall not be thereafter maintained or prosecuted in any court whatever to test or to invalidate the formation of the district unless it is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within 60 days after the date of the filing of the certificate of the Secretary of State in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Harbor Commission [6050. - 6087.]



  ARTICLE 1. Election and Terms [6050. - 6056.]

6050.

Each district formed pursuant to this part shall be governed by a board of five harbor commissioners, who shall hold office for the term of four years from 12 o'clock noon on the first Monday after the first day of January succeeding their election, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.

The first board shall be elected at the election for the formation of the district, and the two candidates for commissioner receiving the highest number of votes shall hold office until the expiration of four years from 12 o'clock noon of the first Monday after the first day of January of the odd-numbered year next succeeding the formation of the district, and until their successors are elected and qualified, and the candidates for commissioner receiving the third, fourth and fifth highest number of votes shall hold office until the expiration of two years from 12 o'clock noon of the first Monday after the first day of January of the odd-numbered year next succeeding the formation of the district, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

6052.

There shall be an election for harbor commissioners within each district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each even-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

6053.

A candidate for harbor commissioner shall be a registered voter of the proposed or existing district, and shall qualify for election by securing a nomination paper proposing his or her candidacy for the office of harbor commissioner signed by not less than 25 but not more than 50 qualified electors of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.

Any qualified voter in the proposed or existing district may sign as many nomination papers as there are commissioners to be elected.

At the first and any subsequent election for commissioners, all candidates shall file their nomination papers with the county elections official of the county, not more than 113 nor less than 88 days before the day of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.1.

If on the 60th day prior to a general district election only one person has been nominated for each of the offices to be filled at that election or no person has been nominated for any such office or offices, and a petition signed by 5 percent of the voters requesting that the election be held has not been presented to the district board, an election shall not be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.2.

If, pursuant to Section 6054.1, no election is held, the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated shall appoint those nominated for the offices or shall, if no person has been nominated, appoint any qualified person to the office. Any person thus appointed shall qualify, take office, and serve as if elected at a general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.3.

Where the office of a commissioner becomes vacant during his term the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by appointment by the majority of remaining commissioners, and if not so filled within 30 days after the vacancy, it shall be filled by appointment by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1778 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

6055.

The commissioners elected at the first election shall, within 10 days from the date of the canvass of the returns of the election, enter upon the duties of office. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each commissioner shall take and subscribe the official oath before the secretary or an officer authorized by law to administer oaths and shall file it with the county elections official of the county in which the district is situated.

They shall elect one of their number as president or chairperson and one of their number as secretary. The president or chairperson and secretary shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6056.

Each commissioner upon taking the oath of office, and for each term, shall file with the county elections official of the county in which the district is situated, a bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), made payable to the district and conditioned on the faithful performance of his or her duties; the bonds are subject to approval by the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administrative Provisions [6060. - 6064.]

6060.

The commissioners shall serve without salary until the yearly gross income of the district, exclusive of taxes levied by the district, exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per year, when the board may, by ordinance, fix their salaries, which shall not exceed the sum of six hundred dollars ($600) per month each.

In addition to any salary received pursuant to this section, the commissioners shall be allowed any actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6061.

The board shall fix the compensation or salary of all subordinate officers or employees of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6062.

The board shall provide for a yearly audit of its books by a certified public accountant or a public accountant and compile a statement of its finances. The statement shall be open to the inspection of any qualified electors of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 230.)
-------------------------------------------

6063.

The board shall hold at least one meeting a month, at such time as is fixed by ordinance of the board. The meeting shall be held within the district and shall be open to the public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6064.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers [6070. - 6087.]

6070.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 660, the board may pass all necessary ordinances for the regulation of the district, including, but not limited to, ordinances to provide for the protection and safety of persons or the property of persons using district facilities, and persons and property in and upon waters subject to the jurisdiction of the district, and adjacent property owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.2.

Before any ordinance may be adopted, the violation of which shall be a misdemeanor, a notice shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district, or if none, in any newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the district, or a part thereof, is located, stating generally the nature of the ordinance proposed, stating where and when a copy thereof may be inspected, and specifying the date, not less than 20 days from the date of publication of such notice, on which the board will meet for the purpose of adopting the ordinance. The ordinance shall become effective immediately upon adoption by the board, unless another effective date is set forth by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.4.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of a district ordinance adopted pursuant to Sections 6070 and 6070.2 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.6.

The district’s manager, harbormaster or wharfinger, or any duly authorized representative of one of these persons, shall have the power to issue citations for violation of district ordinances in the manner provided by Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.6) of Title 3, Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

6071.

It may employ engineers, attorneys and any other officers and employees necessary in the work of the district. It shall appoint a treasurer, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the board, and whose duty it shall be to receive and safely keep all moneys of the district. He shall comply with all provisions of law governing the deposit and securing of public funds. He shall pay out moneys only on warrants duly authorized by the board and not otherwise; provided, however, that no warrants need be issued for the payment of principal and interest on bonds of the district. He shall at regular intervals, at least once each month, submit to the secretary of the district a written report and accounting of all receipts and disbursements and fund balances, a copy of which report he shall file with the board.

The treasurer may appoint a deputy or deputies for whose acts he and his bondsman shall be responsible. Such deputy or deputies shall hold office subject to the pleasure of the treasurer and shall receive such compensation as may be provided by the board. Said treasurer shall execute a bond covering the faithful performance by him of the duties of his office and his duties with respect to all moneys coming into his hands as treasurer in such amount as shall be fixed by resolution of said board. The surety bond herein required shall be executed only by a surety company authorized to do business in the State of California and the premium therefor shall be paid by the district out of its general fund. Said bond shall be approved by the board and filed with the secretary of the district. Said treasurer before entering upon the duties of his office shall take and file with the secretary of the district the oath of office required by the Constitution of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6072.

It may sue and be sued in the name of the district in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.

It may adopt a seal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1973, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6074.

It may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease or otherwise acquire, hold and enjoy and lease and dispose of real and personal property of every kind, within or without the district, necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6075.

Notwithstanding Section 6012: 

(a) A harbor district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or develop any and all harbor works or facilities within the limits of its established boundaries. No interest in lands may be acquired, either by lease, purchase, or the exercise of the power of eminent domain within any port district, chartered port, harbor improvement district, incorporated city, or recreational harbor district without the prior consent to the acquisition by resolution of the governing body of each district, port, or city in which the lands are located. 

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a harbor district that does not operate on tide and submerged lands that have been granted by legislative enactment may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or develop any and all harbor works or facilities within or outside the boundaries of the district. No interest in lands may be acquired, either by lease, purchase, or the exercise of the power of eminent domain within any port district, chartered port, harbor improvement district, incorporated city, county, or recreational harbor district without the prior consent to the acquisition by resolution of the governing body of the district, port, city, or county in which the lands are located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 770, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6076.

It may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.

It may borrow money and incur indebtedness and issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness. All bond elections called by the board shall be conducted and held pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 4 of Division 4, Title 4 of the Government Code.

When in that article, the word “city” is used it includes the district and whenever the words “legislative body” are used they mean the board.

The purposes for which bonded indebtedness may be incurred by the district are described in Section 6075.

All bonds issued shall be signed by the board and a district shall not incur a bonded indebtedness which in the aggregate exceeds 15 percent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 530.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.1.

Whenever the improvement and development work for which any issue of bonds has been voted has been constructed and the proceeds of the bonds sold have not been entirely expended, the board may by resolution order that the unexpended proceeds be placed in the fund provided for the purpose of paying principal and interest of said bonds or said board may by resolution direct that all or a part of said unexpended proceeds be used for the purpose of purchasing outstanding bonds of said district. Said bonds may be purchased only after the publication at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the district of a notice inviting sealed proposals for the sale of bonds to the district. The notice shall state the time and place when the proposals will be opened and the amount of money available for the purchase of the bonds. The legislative body may reject any or all proposals and if it rejects all thereof, may within a period of thirty days thereafter purchase for cash any outstanding bonds of the district but in that event the purchase price shall not be more than the lowest purchase price at which bonds were tendered to the district in the public bidding.

Any bonds purchased under the authority of this section shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.2.

It may provide for, and supervise pilots and the pilotage of sea-going vessels within the harbor and it may regulate and control the anchoring, mooring, towing, and docking of all vessels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.3.

It may perform the functions of warehousemen, stevedores, lighterers, reconditioners, shippers and reshippers of properties of all kinds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.4.

It may manage the business of the district and promote the maritime and commercial interest by proper advertisement of its advantages and by the solicitation of business within or without the district, within other States or in foreign countries, through such employees or agencies as are expedient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.5.

A harbor district may acquire, purchase, takeover, construct, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate grain elevators, bunkering facilities, belt or other railroads, floating plants, lighterage, towage facilities, and any and all other facilities, aids, equipment, or property necessary for, or incident to, the development and operation of a harbor or for the accommodation and promotion of commerce, navigation, or fishery in the harbor district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.5.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the Oxnard Harbor District may acquire, purchase, take over, construct, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate airports and roads with the prior consent of each district, port, city, or county in which the lands are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 770, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.6.

A harbor district may by resolution order that all or any of the funds under its control and not necessary for current operating expenses be invested in accordance with Section 53601 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 389, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6078.

The board may do all other acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6079.

The board shall by ordinance fix the rate of wharfage charges and other charges which are appropriate for the use of any of the facilities owned and constructed or services furnished or provided by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6081.

By resolution, the board may provide for the creation and accumulation of a fund for capital outlays.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

6082.

At any time after the creation of the fund, the board may transfer to the capital outlay fund any unencumbered surplus funds raised for any purpose whatever, remaining on hand at the end of any fiscal year or years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

6083.

The capital outlay fund shall remain inviolate for the making of any capital outlays and the money shall not be disbursed from the fund except for such a purpose unless the district board submits a proposition to the electors of the district to obtain their consent to use the money in the fund for some other specific purpose. The proposition may be submitted at any election. A two-thirds vote of all the voters voting at the election is necessary to authorize the expenditure of the money for such other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

6084.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the board may borrow money by issuance of promissory notes, or execute conditional sales contracts to purchase personal property, in an amount or of a value not exceeding in the aggregate at any one time the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000), for the purposes of acquiring land for and constructing or operating any work, project, or facility authorized by subdivision (d) of Section 6012 or Section 6075 or for the making of improvements or the purchase of equipment or for the maintenance thereof.

All moneys borrowed pursuant to this section shall not be borrowed for a term exceeding five years, and the indebtednesses shall not incur a rate of interest in excess of 12 percent per annum. The indebtedness shall be authorized by a resolution of the board of commissioners adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board.

As a condition precedent to the borrowing of any money or the execution of any conditional sales contract, as provided in this section, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board shall first by a two-thirds vote approve by resolution and have on file a report on the engineering and economic feasibility relating to the project contemplated for the expenditure of the borrowed money or conditional sales contract. The feasibility report shall be prepared and signed by an engineer or engineers licensed and registered under the laws of the State of California.

The district shall budget, levy, and collect taxes and pay for all indebtedness without limitation by any other provision of this part.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any money borrowed from any agency or department of the United States government or of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6084.2.

(a) A district may issue limited obligation notes after the adoption, by a four-fifths vote of all the commissioners of the board, of a resolution reciting each of the following:

(1) That the resolution is being adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The purposes of incurring the indebtedness.

(3) The estimated amount of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum amount of notes to be issued, and the source of revenue or revenues to be used to secure the limited obligation notes.

(5) The maturity date of the limited obligation notes.

(6) The form of the limited obligation notes.

(7) The manner of execution of the limited obligation notes.

(b) The resolution may also provide for one or more of the following matters:

(1) Insurance for the limited obligation notes.

(2) Procedures in the event of default, terms upon which the limited obligation notes may be declared due before maturity, and the terms upon which that declaration may be waived.

(3) The rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the district’s breach of an agreement with regard to the limited obligation notes.

(4) The terms upon which the holders of the limited obligation notes may enforce agreements authorized by this section.

(5) A procedure for amending or abrogating the terms of the resolution with the consent of the holders of a specified percentage of the limited obligation notes. If the resolution contains this procedure, the resolution shall specifically state the effect of amendment upon the rights of the holders of all of the limited obligation notes.

(6) The manner in which the holders of the limited obligation notes may take action.

(7) Other actions necessary or desirable to secure the limited obligation notes or tending to make the notes more marketable.

(c) The limited obligation notes shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding the rate permitted under Article 7 (commencing with Section 53530) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(d) The limited obligation notes may not mature later than 10 years after the date of the issuance of the notes, and the total amount of the limited obligation notes outstanding at any one time for the district may not exceed the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(e) The agreement between the district and the purchasers of the limited obligation notes shall state that the notes are limited obligation notes payable solely from specified revenue of the district. The pledged revenue shall be sufficient to pay the following amounts annually, as they become due and payable:

(1) The interest and principal on the notes.

(2) Payments required for compliance with the resolution authorizing issuance of the notes or agreements with the purchasers of the notes.

(3) Payments to meet any other obligations of the district that are charges, liens, or encumbrances on the pledged revenue.

(f) The limited obligation notes are special obligations of the district, and shall be a charge against, and secured by a lien upon, and payable, as to the principal thereof and interest thereon, from the pledged revenue. If the revenue described in the authorizing resolution is insufficient for the payment of interest and principal on the notes, the district may make payments from any other funds or revenues that may be applied to their payment. The revenue and any interest earned on the revenue constitute a trust fund for the security and payment of the interest on and principal of the notes.

(g) So long as any limited obligation notes or interest thereon are unpaid following their maturity, the pledged revenue and interest thereon may not be used for any other new purpose.

(h) If the interest and principal on the limited obligation notes and all charges to protect them are paid when due, the district may expend the pledged revenue for other purposes.

(i) Limited obligation notes of the same issue shall be equally secured.

(j) The general fund of the district is not liable for the payment of the principal or the interest on the limited obligation notes.

(k) The holders of the limited obligation notes may not compel the exercise of the taxing power by the district, other than the revenue pledged, or the forfeiture of the district’s property.

(l) Every agreement shall recite in substance that the principal of, and interest on, the limited obligation notes are payable solely from the revenue pledged to the payment of the principal and interest and that the district is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from the pledged revenue.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 389, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6085.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this part, the Crescent City Harbor District may borrow money and incur indebtedness under Section 6077 or under Section 6084 and may accept financial or other assistance from the state or federal government, and may expend such funds for the acquisition, construction, development, ownership, and leasing of fish processing plants and facilities, and for any other buildings, plants, equipment, aids, facilities and improvements necessary for or incident to the accommodation and promotion of commerce and fishery in the harbor district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

6086.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the Port San Luis Harbor District may operate, itself only and not pursuant to a lease agreement with a third party, the portion of its property known as the Port San Luis Trailer Park as a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 798.4 of the Civil Code, until the current occupants of the mobilehome park cease to occupy the park. When any current occupant ceases to occupy his or her mobilehome, the real property on which that occupant’s mobilehome is located shall cease to be used as a location for a mobilehome residence. No current occupant of the park shall acquire, or be entitled to acquire, through occupancy or any other means, a transferable or assumable interest in occupancy in the park.

As used in this section, “current occupant” means any individual occupying a mobilehome as a residence in the Port San Luis Trailer Park on the effective date of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect a current occupant’s right to file a claim against a local public agency as provided in Section 905 of the Government Code.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the use of tide or submerged lands belonging to the Port San Luis Harbor District in any manner inconsistent with the California Constitution or with the public trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6087.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding the borrowing limit set forth in Section 6084, the Oxnard Harbor District may borrow money by issuance of promissory notes, or execute conditional sales contracts to purchase personal property, in an amount or of a value not exceeding in the aggregate at any one time the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), for the purposes of acquiring land for and constructing or operating any work, project, or facility authorized by subdivision (d) of Section 6012 or Section 6075 or for the making of improvements or the purchase of equipment or for the maintenance thereof.

(2) All moneys borrowed pursuant to this section shall be borrowed for a term not exceeding five years, and the
 indebtednesses shall not accrue interest in excess of 12 percent per annum. The indebtedness shall be authorized by a resolution of the board of commissioners adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board.

(3) As a condition precedent to the borrowing of any money or the execution of any conditional sales contract, as provided in this section, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board shall first, by a two-thirds vote, approve by resolution and have on file a report on the engineering and economic feasibility relating to the project contemplated for the expenditure of the borrowed money or conditional sales contract. The feasibility report shall be prepared and signed by an engineer or engineers licensed and registered under the laws of the state.

(4) The district shall budget, levy, and collect taxes and pay for all indebtedness without limitation
 by any other provision of this part.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any money borrowed from any agency or department of the United States government or of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 244.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Taxation and Bonds [6090. - 6094.]

6090.

All bonds issued pursuant to this part and Chapter 32, Statutes of 1901, page 27, are obligations of the district and so long as the bonds are outstanding and unpaid the board of supervisors of the county shall at the time of fixing the general tax levy and in the manner provided for such general tax levy until the bonds are paid or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose, sufficient to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest, levy and collect annually a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on such bonds as it comes due and such part of the principal thereof as will become due before the proceeds of another tax levy made at the time of the next general tax levy for county purposes can be made available for the payment of said principal.

In the event the district has moneys on hand in any year sufficient to meet all or part of the sum coming due for principal and interest on said bonds prior to the time that the proceeds of a tax levy made at the time of the next general tax levy for county purposes can be made available for the payment of said principal and interest and said moneys have been placed in a fund for the purpose of payment of said principal and interest the amount of moneys to be raised by the annual tax for that year may be reduced to a sum sufficient to provide the balance of moneys necessary for the purpose of payment of said principal and interest.

All taxes collected for the payment of principal and interest, shall when collected by the county tax collector, be paid to the treasurer of said district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6091.

The board shall, at least thirty days before the meeting of the board of supervisors at which the general tax levy is fixed, notify the board of supervisors in writing of the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation to meet the payment of principal and interest on outstanding bonds which will become payable before the proceeds of another tax levy made at the time of the next general tax levy for county purposes can be made available for payment of said principal and interest. In fixing the amount of money to be raised by taxation the Board of Harbor Commissioners may take into account all moneys on hand and set aside in a fund for the purpose of paying said principal and interest and the amount of moneys to be raised by taxation shall be the amount required in addition to any moneys on hand and so set aside for the purpose of payment of said principal and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

6092.

The taxes shall be levied upon all of the taxable property within the district taxable for county purposes and are in addition to all other taxes levied for all other county purposes and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as other county taxes are collected and shall be used for no purpose other than for the payment of the bonds and accrued interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6092.5.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6093.

On or before June 15 of each year, the district board shall estimate and determine the amount of money required by the harbor district and shall adopt a preliminary budget which shall be divided into the following main classes:

(a) Ordinary annual expenses.

(b) Capital outlay and capital outlay fund.

(c) Prior indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

6093.1.
